District of Columbia statutes.
8-105.05

Tampering and misuse.

No person shall break, alter, damage, tamper with, or otherwise interfere with or impair the wastewater system.

History

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-95, § 6, 33 DCR 577

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-955.